test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k18_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: dansur
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: dans
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: dansi
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: dans
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: dansir
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: dansir
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: dansum
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: dansa
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: dansurin
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: dansin
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: dansinum
    dansur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: dansins
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: dansirnir
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: dansirnar
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: dansunum
    dansur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: dansanna
